North Carolina, session 2025, HB497.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 6 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-18.3. Prohibited defense.
(a) Prohibition. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the discovery of,
perception of, or belief about another person's actual or perceived sex, gender, gender identity,
or sexual orientation, whether or not accurate, is not a defense to a prosecution under this Article
and is not provocation negating malice as an element of murder.
(b) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as precluding the admission
of evidence of a victim's or witness's conduct, behavior, or statements that is relevant and
otherwise admissible."
SECTION 2. Article 8 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-34.11. Prohibited defense.
(a) Prohibition. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the discovery of,
perception of, or belief about another person's actual or perceived sex, gender, gender identity,
or sexual orientation, whether or not accurate, is not a defense to a prosecution under this Article.
(b) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as precluding the admission
of evidence of a victim's or witness's conduct, behavior, or statements that is relevant and
otherwise admissible."
SECTION 3. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H497-v-1*